Utah statutes.
16-15-104.   Registration required -- Certificate of registration.
(1)  A business trust shall register with the division before doing business
in the state.
(2)  The certificate of registration of a business trust shall set forth:
(a)  the name of the business trust;
(b)  the period of its duration;
(c)  the business purpose for which the business trust is organized;
(d)  the information required by Subsection 16-17-203(1); and
(e)  the name, signature, and street address of all trustees of the business
trust.
